parSem/xip/dev/GRAMMARS/ITALIAN/FST2/src/lex-lakes.lexc
!# ============================================================================
!# TYPE:	lexc
!# ENCODING:	UTF-8
!# 
!# LANGUAGE:    ITALIAN
!#
!# CREATED:	09-Jul-2008
!#
!# ============================================================================


Multichar_Symbols

+Prop


+Lake
+Sea

+Sg +Pl +SP
+Masc +Fem +MF

! special markers
(.)	! optional dot
(-)	! optional hyphen
[-]	! hyphen or space





LEXICON ROOT 


!# Lakes
Mar% Caspio+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!# 	371.000   	Asia 
Lago% Superiore+Prop+Lake		MSG;				!# 82.100  	America del Nord 
Vittoria+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!# 68.100  	Africa 
Huron+Prop+Lake				MSG;				!# 59.600  	America del Nord 
Michigan+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!#  58.016  	America del Nord 
Tanganica+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!#  32.893  	Africa 
Grande% Lago% degli% Orsi+Prop+Lake	MSG;				!#  31.792  	America del Nord 
Bajkal+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!#  31.500  	Asia 
Malawi+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!#  (o Niassa)	30.800  	Africa 
Grande% Lago% degli% Schiavi+Prop+Lake	MSG;				!#  28.438  	America del Nord 
Erie+Prop+Lake				MSG;				!#  25.700  	America del Nord 
Winnipeg+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!#  24.514  	America del Nord 
Ontario+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!#  18.960  	America del Nord 
Balhas+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!#  18.200  	Asia 
Ladoga+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  17.700  	Europa 
Lago% d'Aral+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  17.650*  	Asia 
Ciad+Prop+Lake				MSG; 				!#  16.300  	Africa 
Onega+Prop+Lake				MSG;				!#  9.610  	Europa 
Eyre+Prop+Lake				MSG; 				!#  9.500  	Oceania
Gairdner+Prop+Lake			MSG;				!#  9.500  	Oceania
Frome+Prop+Lake				MSG;				!#  9.500  	Oceania 
Lago% de% Nicaragua+Prop+Lake		MSG; 				!#  8.430  	America Centrale 
Titicaca+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  8.300  	America del Sud 
Athabasca+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  7.935  	America del Nord 
Lago% delle% Renne+Prop+Lake		MSG; 				!#  6.650  	America del Nord 
Turkana+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  6.400  	Africa 
Issyk-Kul+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  6.200  	Asia 
Torrens+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  Laghi Eyre, Torrens, Gairdner e Frome 	5.900  	Oceania 
Lago% di% Urmia+Prop+Lake		MSG; 				!#  Laghi di Urmia e Van 	5.800  	Asia 
Nettiling+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  5.542  	America del Nord 
Vänern+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  5.490  	Europa 
Alberto+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  5.400  	Africa 
Winnipegosis+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  5.374  	America del Nord 
Bangweulu+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  5.000  	Africa 
Zajsan+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  5.000  	Asia 

Greater% Saimaa+Prop+Lake		MSG;  				!#  4.377   	Finlandia 
Lago% dei% Ciudi+Prop+Lake		MSG;			 	!#  3.550  	Estonia, Russia 
Vättern+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  1.898  	Svezia 
Ilmen+Prop+Lake				MSG; 				!#  1.410  	Russia 
Vyg+Prop+Lake				MSG;				!#  1.250  	Russia 
Lago% Bianco+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  1.125  	Russia 
Mälären+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  1.084  	Svezia 
Paijänne+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  1.081  	Finlandia 
Topozero+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  1.049  	Russia 
Inari+Prop+Lake				MSG; 				!#  1.040 	Finlandia 
Pielinen+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  894  	Finlandia 
Oulujärvi+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  887  	Finlandia 
Imandra+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  876  	Russia 
Segozero+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  815  	Russia 
Pjaozero+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  659  	Russia 
Haukivesi+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  620  	Finlandia 
Balaton+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  592  	Ungheria 
Kovdozero+Prop+Lake			MSG;			 	!#  584  	Russia 
Lago% di% Ginevra+Prop+Lake		MSG; 				!#  580  	Francia, Svizzera 
Lago% di% Costanza+Prop+Lake		MSG;		 		!#  538  	Austria, Germania, Svizzera 
Orivesi-Paasivesi+Prop+Lake		MSG;		 		!#  536  	Finlandia 
Kallavesi+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  513  	Finlandia 
Keitele+Prop+Lake			MSG; 				!#  500  	Finlandia






!# oceans, seas
Adriatico+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Atlantico+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Baltico+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Bosforo+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Caribico+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Dardanelli+Prop+Sea			MPL;
Egeo+Prop+Sea				MSG;
Golfo% Persico+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Indiano+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Ionio+Prop+Sea				MSG;
Jonio+Prop+Sea				MSG;
Ligure+Prop+Sea				MSG;
Manica+Prop+Sea				FSG;
mar% d'Azov+Prop+Sea			MSG;
mar% dei% Caraibi+Prop+Sea		MSG;
mar% dei% Sargassi+Prop+Sea		MSG;
mar% del% Nord+Prop+Sea			MSG;
mar% Giallo+Prop+Sea			MSG;
mar% Glaciale% Artico+Prop+Sea		MSG;
mar% Nero+Prop+Sea			MSG;
mar% Rosso+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Mediterraneo+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Pacifico+Prop+Sea			MSG;
Tirreno+Prop+Sea			MSG;
	


!# ========================================================================
!# continuation classes
LEXICON	MSG	+Masc+Sg	#;
LEXICON	FSG	+Fem+Sg		#;
LEXICON	XSG	+MF+Sg		#;

LEXICON	MPL	+Masc+Pl	#;
LEXICON	FPL	+Fem+Pl		#;

LEXICON MSGPL	MSG; MPL;
LEXICON FSGPL	FSG; FPL;
LEXICON MFSGPL	MSGPL; FSGPL;

LEXICON XSP	+MF+SP		#;	! invariant
